Washington statutes.
RCW 36.47.060

Association financial records subject to audit by state auditor.

The financial records of the Washington state association of county officials shall be subject to audit by the state auditor.

[ 1995 c 301 s 66; 1969 ex.s. c 5 s 5; 1963 c 4 s 36.47.060. Prior: 1959 c 130 s 6.]